Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 8 FUNDING ADVANCEMENT FOR SURFACE TRANSPORTATION AND ECONOMIC RECOVERY
(1), (2)(a)(I), IP(2)(b), (2)(b)(I), (2)(c), (3)(a), (3)(c), (4), (5)(c), (5)(k), (5)(r)(I), and (5)(r)(III)(A) amended and (5)(g.5) and (5)(g.7) added, (SB 21-260), ch. 250, p. 1442, § 48, effective June 17; (1)(b)(II), (2)(b)(III), (5)(n), (5)(r)(II), (5)(r)(III), (5)(r)(IV), (5)(r)(V), (5)(r)(VI), (5)(r)(VII)(A), and (5)(r)(VII)(C) amended, (HB 21-1316), ch. 325, p. 2064, § 83, effective July 1; IP(5)(g)(I) and (5)(g)(II) amended, (SB 21-257), ch. 478, p. 3421, § 6, effective July 1, 2022.

L. 2022:

(2)(a)(II) amended, (SB 22-162), ch. 469, p. 3432, § 223, effective August 10; IP(5)(g)(I) and (5)(g)(I)(A) amended, (HB 22-1388), ch. 475, p. 3466, § 17, effective January 1, 2023.